Utah statutes.
10-3-709.   Repeal of conflicting provisions -- Title.

Such revision shall be by one ordinance embracing all ordinances of a general and permanent character preserved as changed or added to and perfected by the revision, codification and compilation and shall be a repeal of all ordinances in conflict with the revision, codification and compilation, but all ordinances then enforced shall continue in force after the revision, codification and compilation for the purpose of all rights acquired, fines, penalties and forfeitures and liabilities incurred and actions therefor. The only title necessary for such ordinance shall be "an ordinance revising, codifying and compiling the general ordinances of the city or town of ____ (inserting the name of the municipality)."



Enacted by Chapter 48, 1977 General Session

